Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 16 Trading Stamps

Constitutionality of chapter. —

This chapter is valid and constitutional in its entirety and no section or part thereof is invalid or unconstitutional. Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Purpose of chapter. —

The paramount purpose of this chapter is to eliminate the trading stamp company business which was causing trouble and which, excluding the business of merchants who issued their own stamps and redeemed the same in cash or from their own merchandise, at least in the legislative view, presented an evil to be dealt with. Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 40-16-101.
Prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to use, issue, or distribute, or for any person, firm, association or corporation to furnish to any other person, firm, association or corporation to use, issue or distribute, in, with, or for the sale of goods, wares, merchandise or service, any stamps, coupons, tickets, certificates, cards, or other similar devices, which shall entitle the purchaser receiving the same with the sale of goods, wares, merchandise or service to procure from any person, firm, association or corporation, any goods, wares, merchandise or service upon the production of any number of such stamps, coupons, tickets, certificates, cards or other similar devices.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 6-224.1; W.S. 1977, §

6-9-201

; Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 1.

Legislative intent of severability of provisions. —

The legislature intended that this section should stand in all events, even if an exception or proviso should perchance prove to be invalid or obnoxious. Steffey v. Casper, 357 P.2d 456,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 40-16-102.
Exceptions.

W.S.

40-16-101

through

40-16-103

shall not apply to the use, issuance, distribution, furnishing or redemption of any coupon, ticket, certificate, card or other similar device which is:

Issued, distributed, furnished or redeemed by a manufacturer or packer in connection with the sale of its manufactured or packed products, when the coupon, ticket, certificate, card or other similar device is redeemable without, or accompanying, cash for any product of the manufacturer or packer or for any products not manufactured or packed by the manufacturer or packer if those products are offered by the manufacturer or packer solely for promotional purposes;

Issued, distributed, furnished or redeemed by a merchant when such coupon, ticket, certificate, card, or other similar device is redeemable at face value, in cash or merchandise from the general stock of said merchant at regular retail prices at the option of the holder thereof.

W.S.

40-16-101

through

40-16-103

shall not be interpreted to prohibit promotional activities conducted by a manufacturer in connection with the sale of the manufacturer’s service or product which offers consumers the opportunity to submit to the manufacturer or its agents, stated proof of purchases of the manufacturer’s service, product or cash in exchange for one (1) or more services or products not manufactured by the manufacturer.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 84, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 6-224.2; W.S. 1977, §

6-9-202

; Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 1; 1985, ch. 24, § 1; 1993, ch. 155, § 1.

This section is neither arbitrary nor capricious

and it has a reasonable relation to the evil sought to be suppressed. Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Constitutionality of subsection (a)(ii). —

To hold subsection (a)(ii) unconstitutional would leave the balance of this chapter going beyond the legislature's purpose and contrary to its expressed intent. Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Distinction between subsection (a)(ii) and §

40-16-101

. —

It is evident from their enactment of subsection (a)(ii) that the legislature felt there was a clear distinction between those participants in the trading stamp business so excepted and those made subject to §

40-16-101

.Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Exception of subsection (a)(ii) from operation of §

40-16-101

is reasonable and proper classification. —

Where a merchant issues and redeems his own stamps, it amounts to nothing more than giving a discount on purchases from him, and this in itself makes a distinction between trading stamps being sold to the merchant by a trading stamp company and a merchant issuing and redeeming his own stamps from his own stock or in cash. Therefore the legislature made a reasonable and proper classification when it excepted subsection (a)(ii) from the operation of §

40-16-101

.Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Selling Below Cost in Wyoming,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 235 (1966).

§ 40-16-103.
Penalty for violation; continuing offense; liability of officers and agents; enjoining or ousting violators.

Any person, firm, association or corporation violating any provision of this act [§§

40-16-101

through

40-16-103

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day said person, firm, association or corporation is in violation of this act shall constitute a separate and distinct offense. Whenever a firm, association or corporation shall violate any provision of this act, such violation shall be deemed to be also that of the individual directors, officers, or agents of such firm, association or corporation who shall have authorized, ordered, or done any of the acts constituting in whole or in part such violation. A firm, association or corporation and its different officers, agents, and servants may each be prosecuted separately for violation of any provision of this act, and the acquittal or conviction of one such officer, agent or servant shall not abate the prosecution of the others. Violators of any provision of this act may also be enjoined or ousted from the continuing of such violation by proceedings brought by the district attorney of the proper district, or by the attorney general, regardless of whether criminal proceedings have been instituted.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 84, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 6-224.3; W.S. 1977, §

6-9-203

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see chapter 28 of title 1 and Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Severability. —

Laws 1959, ch. 84, § 4, provides: “If any sentence, clause, provision or section of this act shall be held unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity or the constitutionality of any other sentence, clause, provision or section herein contained and it shall be conclusively presumed that the legislature would have enacted the remainder of this act without the sentence, clause, provision or section so held unconstitutional.”

Applied

in

Steffey v. City of Casper, 357 P.2d 456,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1960).